Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 10. 2015 Large Project Funding

§ 9-15-1001.
Beaumee/Heward Ditch. [Repealed]

History.

2015 ch. 132, § 1, effective March 4, 2015; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-1002.
Neonatal Mule Deer II. [Repealed]

History.

2015 ch. 132, § 1, effective March 4, 2015; repealed by 2021 ch. 13, § 2, effective February 8, 2021.

§ 9-15-1003.
Bolton Creek III. [Repealed]

History.

2015 ch. 132, § 1, effective March 4, 2015; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-1004.
Little Snake River Fisheries. [Repealed]

History.

2015 ch. 132, § 1, effective March 4, 2015; repealed by 2019 ch. 75, § 2, effective February 26, 2019.

§ 9-15-1005.
Little Laramie Conservation Easement. [Repealed]

History.

2015 ch. 132, § 1, effective March 4, 2015; repealed by 2021 ch. 13, § 2, effective February 8, 2021.